New Jersey, session 221, S4626.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the Mattress Stewardship Act. 2.  As used in this act: Brand means a name, symbol, word, or mark that attributes a mattress to the producer of the mattress. Consumer means a person who purchases a mattress for use in the State. Department means the Department of Environmental Protection. Discarded mattress means a mattress that has been used in the State and abandoned or discarded in the State. Discarded mattress does not include a mattress transported from outside of the State to be discarded in the State. Environmentally sound management means policies or procedures for the collection, storage, transportation, renovation, and recycling or disposal of discarded mattresses, which are implemented by a stewardship organization to:  ensure compliance with all applicable federal, State, and local laws, rules, regulations, and ordinances; protect human health and the environment; and address matters including, but not limited to, adequate recordkeeping and accurate tracking and documentation of the collection, transportation, renovation, and recycling or disposal of discarded mattresses within the State. Final disposition means the point by which no further processing takes place and a discarded mattress and its components have been recycled, renovated, or disposed of. Functionally equivalent document means a document provided by a retailer or renovator to a consumer from the stewardship organization that includes information about the stewardship assessment and options available to consumers for the free drop-off or collection of used mattresses. Foundation means a ticking-covered structure that is used to support a mattress or sleep surface and that may be constructed of frames, foam, box springs, or other materials used alone or in combination. Mattress means: (1) a resilient material or combination of materials that is enclosed by a ticking, is used alone or in combination with other products, and is intended for sleeping upon; or (2) a foundation.  Mattress includes a foundation and a renovated mattress or renovated foundation.  Mattress does not include an unattached mattress pad or unattached mattress topper, including items with resilient filling, with or without ticking, intended to be used with or on top of a mattress; a sleeping bag or pillow; a car bed, crib, or bassinet mattress; juvenile products, including a carriage, basket, dressing table, stroller, playpen, infant carrier, lounge pad, or crib bumper, and the pads for those juvenile products; a product containing liquid- and gaseous-filled ticking, including a water bed and an air mattress that does not contain upholstery material between the ticking and the mattress core; or upholstered furniture that does not otherwise contain a detachable mattress or that is a fold out sofa bed or futon. Mattress stewardship program means a mattress stewardship program established and implemented by a stewardship organization pursuant to this act. Person means an individual, a corporation, an organization, or other legal entity. Premium service means a service such as at-home pickup service, including curbside pickup service. Producer means any person that: (1) manufactures a mattress that is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the State; (2) is the owner of a trademark or brand under which a mattress is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the State, whether or not such trademark or brand is registered in the State; or (3) imports a mattress into the United States that is sold or offered for sale in the State. Program mattress means a discarded mattress that a stewardship organization will provide for the environmentally sound management of under a mattress stewardship program. Recycler means a person that recycles discarded mattresses. Recycling means any process in which discarded mattresses or discarded mattress components are dismantled and transformed into new, useable, or marketable materials. Renovate means the process of altering a discarded mattress for resale by adding to or replacing the ticking or filling, adding additional filling, or replacing mattress components.  Renovate does not include: stripping a discarded mattress of the ticking or filling without adding new material; the sanitation or sterilization of a discarded mattress without other alteration of the discarded mattress; recycling; or refurbishing that disqualifies a mattress from having a red wholesale renovator tag affixed to the mattress. Renovator means a person that person that renovates a discarded mattress. Retailer means a person that offers new, used, or renovated mattresses for retail sale in the State. Stewardship assessment means the per unit amount added to the purchase price of a mattress sold to a customer to cover the costs of a mattress stewardship program. Stewardship organization means a nonprofit organization designated by a producer or group of producers to implement a mattress stewardship program. Ticking means the outermost layer of fabric or related material of a mattress or foundation.  Ticking does not include any layer of fabric or material quilted together with, or otherwise attached to, the outermost layer of fabric or material of a mattress. 3.  a.  No later than one year after the effective date of this act, each producer shall join a stewardship organization in order to implement a mattress stewardship program.  The purpose of a mattress stewardship program shall be to provide for the environmentally sound management of discarded mattresses in the State. b.  No later than one year after the effective date of this act, each retailer or renovator that sells or offers for sale mattresses in this State shall register with a stewardship organization and comply with the provisions of this act. c. No later than one year after the effective date of this act, a stewardship organization shall prepare and submit to the department a plan for the development and implementation of a mattress stewardship program.  The plan shall, at a minimum: (1) describe how the stewardship organization will manage and administer the mattress stewardship program; (2) identify, in two separate lists: (a) each producer, renovator, and retailer that is registered with the stewardship organization as of 30 days before the plan is submitted to the department; and (b) the brands of mattresses that are included in the stewardship program; (3) include a description of how the stewardship organization will provide for the environmentally sound management of program mattresses, regardless of the producer.  The description shall include, at a minimum: (a) the identification of the proposed recyclers that the stewardship organization will contract with to process program mattresses and the recycling methods that the recyclers will use; (b) information concerning the methods the stewardship organization will utilize to implement the mattress stewardship program using environmentally sound management practices; and (c) information concerning the methods the stewardship organization will utilize to handle non-program mattresses; (4) provide for convenient consumer access to the program, including the establishment of permanent mattress drop-off locations throughout the State, collection events in underserved areas of the State, and a convenient way for the public to access a list of mattress collection opportunities; (5) establish performance goals for the stewardship program, including a mattress collection target and mattress recycling rates; (6) include a proposed mattress stewardship assessment and a proposed method of collecting the mattress stewardship assessment from retailers and ensuring the mattress stewardship assessment is remitted to the stewardship organization.  A proposed mattress assessment shall be sufficient to recover, but not exceed, the costs of implementing and administering the mattress stewardship program; (7) describe the educational materials and outreach efforts that will be utilized to inform consumers about the mattress stewardship program, including mattress collection opportunities; (8) address procedures for identifying substantial or material changes to the system for collecting discarded mattresses for which a plan amendment would be required pursuant to section 5 of this act; (9) develop the criteria for determining whether a mattress should be rejected as unacceptable for recycling, including when a mattress is contaminated, wet, crushed, or would otherwise pose a health or safety risk to personnel or equipment, and a procedure for how these rejected mattresses should be disposed of; (10) include an anticipated annual operating budget for the mattress stewardship program, which shall include, but need not be limited to, budget line items related to: (a) the collection, transportation, and processing of program mattresses; (b) the anticipated amount of moneys that the stewardship organization will hold in unallocated reserve funds for the mattress stewardship program; and (c) the annual fee to be paid to the department pursuant to subsection d. of section 12 of this act; and (11) include information on if the stewardship organization plans to implement any of the compliance standards that are optional to include within a mattress stewardship program pursuant to subsection g. of section 6 of this act. 4.  a.  Within 60 days of the departments receipt of a plan submitted in accordance with subsection c. of section 3 of this act, the commissioner shall approve or disapprove the plan, including the mattress stewardship assessment identified therein, and provide written notice of its determination to the stewardship organization.  If the department does not provide notice of its determination within 60 days after its receipt of the plan, the plan shall be deemed to have been approved. b.  If the commissioner disapproves a plan submitted pursuant to subsection c. of section 3 of this act, the written notice provided pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be accompanied by a list, prepared by the department, describing the plan requirements, established in subsection c. of section 3 this act, that have not been satisfied, and the changes that are required for the plan to be approved. No more than 30 days after receipt of the departments written notice and accompanying statement of the reasons for the disapproval of a plan submitted pursuant to subsection c. of section 3 of this act, the stewardship organization shall submit a modified plan to the department for approval. c.  Within 30 days after receipt of a modified plan that has been submitted in accordance with subsection b. of this section, the department shall approve the plan or reject it, and shall certify the approval or rejection to the stewardship organization. Upon the departments disapproval of any modified plan submitted pursuant to subsection b. of this section, or upon the failure of the stewardship organization to submit a modified plan as required, the department shall propose any revisions to the plan the department deems necessary, and shall transmit the proposed plan revisions to the stewardship organization.  Upon receipt of the departments proposed revisions to the plan, the stewardship organization shall implement the revised plan unless otherwise agreed to by the department. d.  Beginning no later than one year after a plan has been approved by the department pursuant to this section, the stewardship organization shall implement a mattress stewardship program as described in the approved plan. e.  The department shall post a proposed plan, submitted to the department pursuant to subsection c. of section 3 of this act, or a plan amendment submitted pursuant to section 5 of this act, on its Internet website and provide for public comment on the proposed plan or plan amendment for at least 15 days prior to approving, disapproving, or requesting any information on the plan or plan amendment.  The department shall post an approved plan on its Internet website, and update as necessary. 5.  a.  A stewardship organization shall notify the department, in writing, within 30 days of any of the following changes to the plan approved pursuant to section 4 of this act: (1) a change in the location or the number of permanent collection sites identified in the plan; (2) change in the producers, renovators, or retailers that are registered with the stewardship organization; or (3) a change in the recyclers or renovators and transporters that manage the discarded mattresses collected by the stewardship organization under the program. b.  A stewardship organization shall submit an amendment to the plan approved by the department pursuant to section 4 of this act if, at any time, there is a substantial or material change to the system for collecting discarded mattresses under the program. c.  The department shall not request an amendment to an approved plan within two years of the initial implementation of the mattress stewardship program by the stewardship organization. d.  A proposed change to the amount of the mattress stewardship assessment shall not require a program plan amendment. e.  All proposed amendments to an approved plan shall be submitted to the department for approval in accordance with the requirements of section 4 of this act. f.  The departments rejection of, or request for additional information for, a plan amendment does not relieve a stewardship organization from continuing to implement a mattress stewardship program in compliance with a previously approved plan pending a final action by the department on the plan amendment. 6.  a.  Beginning one year after the effective date of this act, a producer, renovator, or retailer shall not sell or offer for sale any mattress to any person in the State unless the producer, renovator, or retailer is registered with a stewardship organization that has submitted a plan to the department pursuant to subsection c. of section 3 of this act to implement a mattress stewardship program. b.  Beginning on the date that a mattress stewardship program has been implemented in the State, a retailer shall: (1) purchase a mattress only from a producer or renovator that is registered with a stewardship organization as of the date of purchase; (2) collect, at the point of sale, the mattress stewardship assessment established pursuant to a plan approved by the department pursuant to section 4 of this act and remit the stewardship assessment to the stewardship organization that implements the mattress stewardship program, except as provided in subsection c. of this section if the retailer or renovator elects to cover the costs of the stewardship assessment; and (3) provide to consumers, at the point of sale, information on collection opportunities for discarded mattresses through the mattress stewardship program. c.  Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section, a retailer or renovator may directly pay the applicable charge of the stewardship assessment to the stewardship organization on behalf of the consumer or ultimate end user of the mattress if the retailer or renovator enters into a written agreement with the stewardship organization to remit the applicable charge of the stewardship assessment to the stewardship organization on behalf of the consumer.  A retailer or renovator that elects to cover the costs of the stewardship assessment pursuant to this subsection may make the charge visible on the receipt, invoice, or functionally equivalent document. d.  Beginning on the date that a mattress stewardship program has been implemented in the State, a retailer shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions of this section, if on the date the mattress was ordered from the producer or its agent, the producer of the mattress brand is listed on the departments Internet website as implementing or participating in an approved mattress stewardship program. e.  A retailer or renovator shall identify the mattress stewardship assessment as a separate line item on the receipt, invoice, or functionally equivalent document for a mattress provided to a consumer at the point of sale, except as provided in subsection c. of this section if the retailer or renovator elects to cover the costs of the stewardship assessment. f.  In implementing a mattress stewardship program, the stewardship organization shall make available on the stewardship organizations Internet website and upon request: (1) information on registered brands provided to the stewardship organization by the producers and renovators registered with the stewardship organization; (2) information on available mattress collection opportunities; and (3) any other information that may be necessary for retailers to comply with the requirements of this section. g.  In implementing a mattress stewardship program, a stewardship organization may, if included in the plan approved by the department pursuant to section 4 of this act: (1) provide for collection sites at permitted solid waste facilities or other suitable sites throughout the State for the collection of discarded mattresses, provided such sites do not impose a fee for making space available for storage containers that the stewardship organization shall provide at no charge; (2) provide for bulk pickup service at no cost to collect a minimum of 100 source separated program mattresses at one time from persons, including retailers; health care, educational, or military facilities; and hotels, motels, inns, and other establishments that provide transient lodging; (3) provide for coordination with organizations that recycle or renovate discarded mattresses; and (4) notify retailers that sell or offer for sale mattresses that are made or sold by producers or renovators registered with the stewardship organization about the mattress stewardship program. h.  In implementing a mattress stewardship program, a stewardship organization shall charge no fee for the collection of discarded program mattresses, except that a stewardship organization may charge a fee if a mattress is collected using a premium service.  A fee charged for a premium service shall only cover the costs of the premium service. i.  A stewardship organization shall retain all records related to the implementation of a mattress stewardship program for not less than three years and make the records available for inspection by the department upon request. 7.  a.  Beginning one year from the date the collection of the stewardship assessment commences, the stewardship organization may change the amount of the stewardship assessment, but changes to the amount of the stewardship assessment shall not be changed more frequently than annually, unless the stewardship organization provides good cause to the department to change the assessment more frequently.  The stewardship organization shall provide at least 90 days notice to the public before the change in the amount of the stewardship assessment is implemented. b. The stewardship organization may conduct a financial review of the stewardship assessments remitted by retailers and renovators to the mattress recycling organization to verify that the assessments paid are proper and accurate and to confirm that all parties required by to pay or collect the assessment are paying or collecting the proper amount.  The financial review shall be carried out in accordance with generally accepted auditing practices and shall be limited in scope to confirm whether the stewardship assessment has been properly collected on all sales of mattresses to consumers in the State.  The stewardship organization shall hire independent third-party auditors to conduct the financial review.  The stewardship organization shall provide to the department a copy of such financial review reports. c.  The department shall actively supervise the conduct of a stewardship organization in establishing, administering, collecting, and disbursing the mattress stewardship assessment. 8.  a.  There is established the Mattress Stewardship Fund as a separate, non-lapsing fund in the Department of the Treasury.  The Mattress Stewardship Fund shall be credited with all surcharges, interest, penalties, and other amounts collected and paid to the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury pursuant to this section.  Moneys in the Mattress Stewardship Fund shall be expended only to: (1) administer and enforce the provisions of this act; or (2) implement an approved mattress stewardship plan.  Prior to making an expenditure from the fund, the department shall consult with the stewardship organization implementing an approved mattress stewardship plan and shall follow the recommendations of the stewardship organization regarding expenditures from the fund, provided that the department determines that the expenditures are in the public interest. b.  Monies deposited in the fund shall be held in interest-bearing accounts in public depositories, as defined pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1970, c.236 (C.17:9-41), and may be invested or reinvested in such securities as are approved by the State Treasurer.  Interest or other income earned on monies deposited into the fund shall be credited to the fund for use as set forth in subsection a. of this section for other monies in the fund. c.  Moneys appropriated from the Mattress Stewardship Fund shall not replace or reduce the allocation of any other funding. 9.  a.  The department shall have the authority to enter upon and inspect, at any time, any public or private property, premises, or place for the purpose of investigating an actual or suspected violation of this act, all in accordance with due process of law. b.  The department shall publish, and update on a continual basis, a list on its Internet website of all producers, renovators, and retailers that are in compliance with the provisions of this act. c.  Upon a written finding by the department, that a producer, renovator, or retailer has not complied with the requirements of this act, in addition to other penalties authorized under section 10 of this act, the department may, after affording the producer, renovator, or retailer a reasonable opportunity to respond to, or rebut, the finding to ensure compliance with the requirements of this act, remove the producer, renovator, or retailer from the list of compliant producers, renovators, and retailers published on the departments Internet website pursuant to subsection b. of this section. 10.  a.  Whenever the commissioner finds that a person has violated any provision of this act, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or any provision of a stewardship plan approved thereunder, or has knowingly made a false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this act, the commissioner may: (1)   issue an order, in accordance with subsection c. of this section, requiring the violator to comply with the provisions of this act, the rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or the stewardship plan approved thereunder, as the case may be; (2)   bring a civil action in accordance with subsection d. of this section; (3)   levy a civil administrative penalty in accordance with subsection e. of this section; (4)   bring an action for a civil penalty in accordance with subsection f. of this section; or (5) notify the public of a producer, renovator, or retailer that is not in compliance with the requirements of this act. b.    Pursuit of any of the remedies specified under this section shall not preclude the seeking of any other remedy specified. c.     Whenever the commissioner finds that a person has violated the provisions of this act, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or any provision of a stewardship plan approved thereunder, the commissioner may issue an administrative enforcement order to the person:  specifying the provision or provisions that the person has violated; citing the action that constituted the violation; requiring the person's compliance with the provision violated; and giving notice of the person's right to a hearing on the matters contained in the administrative enforcement order.  The person subject to the order shall have 20 calendar days from receipt of the order within which to deliver to the commissioner a written request for a hearing.  After the hearing, and upon finding that a violation has occurred, the commissioner may issue a final order.  If no hearing is requested, the order shall become final after the expiration of the 20-day period.  A request for hearing shall not automatically stay the effect of the order. d.    The commissioner shall be authorized to institute a civil action in Superior Court for appropriate relief from any violation of the provisions of this act, or of any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or of a stewardship plan approved thereunder.  Such relief may include, singly or in combination: (1)   a temporary or permanent injunction; (2)   recovery of the reasonable costs of any investigation or inspection that led to the discovery of the violation, and for the recovery of the reasonable costs of preparing and bringing a civil action commenced under this subsection; (3)   recovery of reasonable costs incurred by the State in removing, correcting, or terminating the adverse effects resulting from the violation for which a civil action has been commenced and brought under this subsection; and (4)   recovery of compensatory damages caused by a violation for which a civil action has been commenced and brought under this subsection.  Assessments under this subsection shall be paid to the State Treasurer, except that compensatory damages may be paid by specific order of the court to any persons who have been aggrieved by the violation. e.     (1)  The commissioner shall be authorized to assess a civil administrative penalty not to exceed $1,000 for each violation, provided that each day during which the violation continues shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct offense.  In assessing a civil administrative penalty, the commissioner shall consider the severity of the violation, the measures taken to prevent further violations, and whether the penalty will act as an appropriate deterrent. (2)   Prior to the assessment of a civil administrative penalty under this subsection, the person committing the violation shall be notified by certified mail or personal service that the penalty is being assessed.  The notice shall identify the section of the statute, rule, regulation, or order, or the provision of the stewardship plan, that was violated; recite the facts alleged to constitute a violation; state the basis for the amount of the civil administrative penalties to be assessed; and affirm the rights of the alleged violator to a hearing.  The ordered party shall have 20 days from receipt of the notice within which to deliver to the commissioner a written request for a hearing.  After the hearing and upon finding that a violation has occurred, the commissioner may issue a final order after assessing the amount of the fine specified in the notice.  If no hearing is requested, the notice shall become a final order after the expiration of the 20-day period.  Payment of the assessment is due when a final order is issued or the notice becomes a final order. (3)   The authority to levy an administrative order is in addition to all other enforcement provisions in this act, and the payment of any assessment shall not be deemed to affect the availability of any other enforcement provisions in connection with the violation for which the assessment is levied.  The department may compromise any civil administrative penalty assessed under this section in an amount and with conditions the department determines appropriate. f.     A person who violates any provision of this act, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or the provisions of a stewardship plan approved thereunder, or an administrative order issued pursuant to subsection c. of this section, or a court order issued pursuant to subsection d. of this section, or who fails to pay a civil administrative penalty in full pursuant to subsection e. of this section, or who knowingly makes any false or misleading statement on any application, record, report, or other document required to be submitted to the department, shall be subject, upon order of a court, to a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per day of the violation, and each day during which the violation continues shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct offense.  Any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection may be collected with costs in a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.), or may be collected in a civil action commenced by the commissioner.  In addition to any penalties, costs, or interest charges, the Superior Court, or the municipal court as the case may be, may assess against the violator the amount of economic benefit accruing to the violator from the violation. g.    All penalties collected by the department pursuant to this act shall be deposited into the Mattress Stewardship Fund established pursuant to section 8 of this act, and appropriated annually for the continued administration and enforcement of this act. 11.  a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, the establishment, administration, setting, collection, and disbursement of the stewardship assessment by a stewardship organization shall not be deemed to constitute a violation of any State law relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, or the regulation of trade or commerce, so long as the action is necessary to plan for or implement a mattress stewardship program. b.  The provisions of subsection a. of this section shall not apply to: (1) any agreement establishing or affecting the price of a mattress unrelated to the mattress stewardship assessment; or (2) any agreement restricting the output or production of a mattress or the geographic area or customers to which a mattress will be sold. 12.  a.  No later than July 1 of the year after a mattress stewardship program is implemented, and annually thereafter, a stewardship organization shall prepare and submit a written report to the department evaluating the implementation of the mattress stewardship program.  Each annual report shall include, the following information: (1) the total sales of mattresses sold to consumers in the State in the previous calendar year by producers, renovators, and retailers registered with the stewardship organization; (2) the mattress stewardship programs total costs and revenues for the previous calendar year; (3) information on the amount and tonnage of discarded mattresses collected pursuant to the mattress stewardship program for recycling during the previous calendar year; (4) the weight of mattress materials recycled and the final disposition of mattress materials, by weight and by material, sold as commodities in secondary markets; (5) the weight of program mattress materials sent for disposal at each of the following: (a) waste-to-energy facilities; (b) landfills; and (c) any other facilities; (6) an evaluation of why the mattress materials sent for disposal were not recycled and a description of program efforts to increase the recycling rate of mattress materials under the mattress stewardship program; (7) the strategies that the stewardship organization will take to address discarded mattresses that are not program mattresses and discarded mattresses that are illegally dumped; (8) a summary of the public education offered in the previous calendar year that supports the mattress stewardship program and examples of public education materials; (9) an evaluation of the effectiveness of methods and processes used to achieve the approved program plan goals of the mattress stewardship program, information on progress made toward achieving the goals, an explanation of why any goals were not met during the previous calendar year, if applicable, and any options for improving progress toward meeting the goals in the future, if applicable; (10) a report by an independent certified public accountant, retained by the stewardship organization at the stewardship organizations expense, providing the accountants audit of the stewardship organizations financial statements; (11) a report on the outcome of the financial review of any entities the stewardship organization contracts with; (12) recommendations for changes to the mattress stewardship program; and (13) an updated operating budget for the mattress stewardship program for the upcoming calendar year. b.  Within 90 days of receiving an annual report submitted to the department pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the department shall: (1) review the report; (2) publish the report on the departments Internet website; and (3) prepare, and publish on the departments Internet website, a summary report describing the progress that is being made under the mattress stewardship program. c.  The department shall not disclose any financial, production, or sales data reported by a producer, renovator, or retailer pursuant to this section, except that the department may disclose such data in aggregate or summary format, so long as the producers, renovators, and retailers and their financial, production, or sales data are not specifically identified, and so long as the summary omits any reference to unique characteristics from which the identities of individual producers might be inferred or otherwise ascertained. d.  Within 90 days of receiving the initial annual report submitted on behalf of the stewardship organization pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the department shall establish an annual fee to be paid by the stewardship organization that is reasonably calculated to cover the actual costs of the department to administer, implement, and enforce the provisions of this act. e.  Except as provided in subsection d. of this section, for the first year that the mattress stewardship program is implemented, the department shall provide notice to a stewardship organization no later than April 1 of each year of the annual fee for the upcoming calendar year. f.  Annual fees collected pursuant to subsections d. and e. of this section shall be deposited in the Mattress Stewardship Fund established pursuant to section 8 of this act. 13.  The department shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 14.  This act shall take effect immediately.